Massachusetts, session 194th, S955.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 5 of Chapter 44B of the General Laws is hereby amended in clause (b) (2) by
adding after the words “not be used for maintenance” the following words “provided however
local public housing authorities established pursuant to Chapter 121B may use such funds only
for extraordinary maintenance, equipment replacement betterments and additions”.
of 1